Wyoming, session 2026, HB0083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-1-110(c) is amended to read:

28-1-110. Failure to appear; refusal to testify or
produce documents; disturbances.

(c) Any person who violates this section, upon
conviction, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, may be
punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars
($100.00) and seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),
HB0083

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0248
imprisonment in county jail for a period not to exceed six
(6) months, or both.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0083